Illinois, session 104th, HB4200.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Educational Choice for Illinois Children Act. 6    Section 5. Findings; purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (1) Section 1 of Article X of the Illinois 9    Constitution provides that "[a] fundamental goal of the 10    People of the State is the educational development of all 11    persons to the limits of their capacities." However, the 12    State has failed to meet this goal. According to the 2024 13    National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP), 62% of 14    4th graders in the State were below proficient in 15    mathematics, and 68% of 8th graders in the State were 16    below proficient in mathematics. In reading, 70% of 4th 17    graders were below proficient, and 67% of 8th graders were 18    below proficient.19        (2) The recently enacted One Big Beautiful Bill Act 20    (Pub. L. 119-21) offers a federal tax credit of up to 21    $1,700 per year for any individual who makes a qualified 22    contribution to a scholarship granting organization, 23    thereby increasing funding for these organizations to help   HB4200- 2 -LRB104 15764 HLH 29198 b1    families pay for their children to attend the K-12 school 2    of their choice. The list of eligible educational expenses 3    includes tuition, fees, tutoring, educational therapies, 4    transportation, technology, and other expenses for 5    children attending public schools and private schools.6        (3) Illinois experienced great success with its own 7    tax credit program, the Invest in Kids Act, which was 8    allowed to expire at the end of 2023. According to the 9    Department of Revenue, over 40,940 scholarships were 10    awarded during the time that the Invest in Kids Act was 11    active. Failure to opt into the provisions of the One Big 12    Beautiful Bill Act would place Illinois at a competitive 13    disadvantage with surrounding states that are likely to 14    opt into the school choice provisions of the One Big 15    Beautiful Bill Act.16        (4) The ability to choose where your child goes to 17    school should not be a privilege reserved for the wealthy. 18    Too many students are trapped in an educational learning 19    environment that fails to meet their needs, and the 20    financial burden of attending a different school is too 21    often out of reach. Scholarships from scholarship granting 22    organizations under the One Big Beautiful Bill Act can 23    help alleviate this financial burden for families that 24    could not otherwise afford private school and would result 25    in no additional cost to the State. 26    (b) It is the purpose of this Act to support school choice   HB4200- 3 -LRB104 15764 HLH 29198 b1in the State of Illinois by directing the Department of 2Revenue and the State Board of Education to develop a list of 3scholarship granting organizations to which qualified 4contributions may be made under Section 70411 of the One Big 5Beautiful Bill Act.  6    Section 10. List of scholarship granting organizations. By 7January 1, 2026, the State Board of Education, in coordination 8with the Department of Revenue, shall establish and approve a 9list of scholarship granting organizations that meet the 10requirements of Section 70411 of the One Big Beautiful Bill 11Act to facilitate opting the State of Illinois into the school 12choice tax credit provisions of the One Big Beautiful Bill 13Act. The list of eligible scholarship granting organizations 14shall be published on the State Board of Education's Internet 15website to allow the public to easily identify organizations 16in the State of Illinois that are eligible to accept donations 17that qualify for the tax credit under the One Big Beautiful 18Bill Act. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.